Illinois, session 104th, HB3547.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Legislative Commission Reorganization Act 5of 1984 is amended by adding Section 9-4 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 130/9-4 new)7    Sec. 9-4. Legislative mail disclaimer. All documents that 8are printed by the Legislative Printing Unit for distribution 9by mail to the constituents of a member of the General Assembly 10shall have printed on the envelope of the document, in a large 11font, the following disclaimer: "THIS MAILING WAS PAID AT 12ILLINOIS TAXPAYERS EXPENSE.".